Rhode Island statutes. Title 46 Waters and Navigation
Chapter 12.2 Rhode Island Infrastructure Bank

46-12.2-1.
Legislative findings.

It is hereby found that there exists and will in the future exist within the state of Rhode Island the need to construct facilities and to facilitate projects for the abatement of pollution caused by wastewater for the enhancement of the waters of the state, and for the completion of renewable energy and energy efficiency projects in order to save property owners money and to encourage job and business growth in Rhode Island.

It is hereby further found that to meet water quality goals under federal and state law, and to secure maximum benefit of funding programs available under federal and state law pertaining to wastewater pollution abatement projects, it is necessary to establish a revolving loan fund program in accordance with federal and state law to provide a perpetual source of low cost financing for water pollution abatement projects.

It is hereby further found that to secure maximum benefit to the state from funding programs available under federal and state law and, to the extent permissible to attract private capital, for water pollution abatement projects, for safe drinking water projects, for municipal road and bridge projects, and other infrastructure related projects, it is necessary to establish a finance agency to administer the revolving loan funds and other financing mechanisms, and for the finance agency to work with the department of environmental management, Rhode Island department of transportation, the Rhode Island office of energy resources and other federal and state agencies for proper administration of revolving loan funds and other financing mechanisms.

It is hereby further found that cities and towns can lower the costs of borrowing for road and bridge projects through cooperation with the Rhode Island infrastructure bank and that greater coordination among cities and towns will enable more efficient allocation of infrastructure resources by the state of Rhode Island.

It is hereby further found that the geographic size of and population of Rhode Island, while often derided as an impediment to economic growth, are potential assets, not handicaps, to better infrastructure development.

It is hereby further found that initiatives for infrastructure finance can best be accomplished through a new, streamlined entity that seeks to foster and develop a public-private sector partnership that takes advantage of all of Rhode Island’s strengths.

It is hereby further found that expanding the Rhode Island clean water finance agency and renaming it the Rhode Island infrastructure bank provides the best avenue for reducing ongoing pollution to the waters of the state and emissions that degrade air quality and contribute to climate change while fostering the creation of jobs and the realization of energy cost savings through the facilitation of infrastructure improvements.

History of Section.

P.L. 1989, ch. 303, § 2; P.L. 2001, ch. 144, § 4; P.L. 2001, ch. 163, § 4; P.L. 2015, ch. 141, art. 14, § 17.

46-12.2-2.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context clearly indicates otherwise, the following words and phrases shall have the following meanings:

“Agency” means the Rhode Island clean water finance agency, and, effective September 1, 2015, and thereafter, shall mean the Rhode Island infrastructure bank;

“Approved project” means any project or portion thereof that has been issued a certificate of approval by the department for financial assistance from the agency, and also includes any project approved for financial assistance from the agency in accordance with state law, and, furthermore, shall include water pollution abatement projects funded outside of the water pollution control revolving fund, the Rhode Island water pollution control revolving fund, or the local interest subsidy trust fund, without the requirement of the issuance of a certificate of approval; and, furthermore, shall include resiliency related infrastructure projects, and projects which may, subject to compliance with all state and federal requirements, include state and federal infrastructure located within the state of Rhode Island;

“Board” means the board of directors of the agency;

“Bond act” means any general or special law authorizing a local governmental unit to incur indebtedness for all or any part of the cost of projects coming within the scope of a water pollution abatement project, or for other projects related to this chapter, including but not limited to, §

45-12-2

;

“Bonds” means bonds, notes, or other evidence of indebtedness of the agency;

“Certificate of approval” means the certificate of approval contemplated by §

46-12.2-8

;

“Chief executive officer” means the mayor in any city, the president of the town council in any town, and the executive director of any authority or commission, unless some other officer or body is designated to perform the functions of a chief executive officer under any bond act or under the provisions of a local charter or other law;

“Clean Water Act” or “act” means the Federal Water Pollution Control Act, act of June 30, 1948, ch. 758, as added Oct. 18, 1972, Pub. L. No. 92-500, 86 Stat. 896, as added Dec. 27, 1977, Pub. L. No. 95-217, 91 Stat. 1566 (codified at 33 U.S.C. § 1251 et seq., as amended and as hereafter amended from time to time);

“Corporation” means any corporate person, including, but not limited to: corporations, societies, associations, limited liability companies, partnerships, and sole proprietorships;

“Cost” as applied to any approved project, means any or all costs, whenever incurred, approved by the agency in accordance with §

46-12.2-8

, of planning, designing, acquiring, constructing, and carrying out and placing the project in operation, including, without limiting the generality of the foregoing, amounts for the following: planning, design, acquisition, construction, expansion, improvement, and rehabilitation of facilities; acquisition of real or personal property; demolitions and relocations; labor, materials, machinery, and equipment; services of architects, engineers, and environmental and financial experts and other consultants; feasibility studies, plans, specifications, and surveys; interest prior to and during the carrying out of any project and for a reasonable period thereafter; reserves for debt service or other capital or current expenses; costs of issuance of local governmental obligations or non-governmental obligations issued to finance the obligations including, without limitation, fees, charges, and expenses and costs of the agency relating to the loan evidenced thereby, fees of trustees and other depositories, legal and auditing fees, premiums and fees for insurance, letters or lines of credit or other credit facilities securing local governmental obligations or non-governmental obligations and other costs, fees, and charges in connection with the foregoing; and working capital, administrative expenses, legal expenses, and other expenses necessary or incidental to the aforesaid, to the financing of a project, and to the issuance therefor of local government obligations under the provisions of this chapter;

“Department” means the department of environmental management;

“Financial assistance” means any form of financial assistance provided by the agency to a local governmental unit, person, or corporation in accordance with this chapter for all or any part of the cost of an approved project, including, without limitation: grants, temporary and permanent loans, with or without interest, guarantees, insurance, subsidies for the payment of debt service on loans, lines of credit, and similar forms of financial assistance; provided, however, notwithstanding the foregoing, for purposes of capitalization grant awards made available to the agency, pursuant to the American Recovery and Reinvestment Act of 2009 (Pub. L. No. 111-5), or as otherwise required in connection with other capitalization grant awards made available to the agency, financial assistance shall also include principal forgiveness and negative interest loans;

“Fully marketable form” means a local governmental obligation in form satisfactory to the agency duly executed and accompanied by an opinion of counsel of recognized standing in the field of municipal law whose opinions have been and are accepted by purchasers of like obligations to the effect that the obligation is a valid and binding obligation of the local governmental unit issuing the obligation, enforceable in accordance with its terms;

“General revenues,” when used with reference to a local governmental unit, means revenues, receipts, assessments, and other moneys of the local governmental unit received from or on account of the exercise of its powers and all rights to receive the same, including without limitation:

Taxes;

Wastewater system revenues;

Assessments upon or payments received from any other local governmental unit that is a member or service recipient of the local governmental unit, whether by law, contract, or otherwise;

Proceeds of local governmental obligations and loans and grants received by the local governmental unit in accordance with this chapter;

Investment earnings;

Reserves for debt service or other capital or current expenses;

Receipts from any tax, excise, or fee heretofore or hereafter imposed by any general or special law all or a part of the receipts of which are payable or distributable to or for the account of the local governmental unit;

Local aid distributions; and

Receipts, distributions, reimbursements, and other assistance received by or for the account of the local governmental unit from the United States or any agency, department, or instrumentality thereof;

“Loan” means a loan by the agency to a local governmental unit, or person, or corporation for costs of an approved project, including, without limitation, temporary and permanent loans, and lines of credit;

“Loan agreement” means any agreement entered into by the agency with a local governmental unit, person, or corporation pertaining to a loan, other financial assistance, local governmental obligations, or non-governmental obligations, including, without limitation: a loan agreement, trust agreement, security agreement, reimbursement agreement, guarantee agreement, financing lease agreement, appropriation agreement, or similar instrument;

“Local aid distributions” means receipts, distributions, reimbursements, and other assistance payable by the state to or for the account of a local governmental unit, except such receipts, distributions, reimbursements, and other assistance restricted by law to specific statutorily defined purposes;

“Local governmental obligations” means bonds, notes, financing lease obligations, appropriation obligations, and other evidences of indebtedness in fully marketable form issued by a local governmental unit to evidence a loan or other financial assistance, from the agency in accordance with this chapter or otherwise as provided herein;

“Local governmental unit” means any town, city, district, commission, agency, authority, board, bodies politic and corporate, public corporation, or other political subdivision or instrumentality of the state or of any political subdivision thereof, including the Narragansett Bay commission; and, for purposes of dam safety or dam maintenance projects, any person seeking financial assistance as a joint applicant with any of the above entities;

“Local interest subsidy trust fund” means the local interest subsidy trust fund established under §

46-12.2-6

;

“Non-governmental obligations” means bonds, notes, or other evidences of indebtedness in fully marketable form issued by a person or corporation to evidence a loan, or other financial assistance, from the agency in accordance with this chapter or otherwise as provided herein;

“Person” means any natural person;

“Priority determination system” means the system by which water pollution abatement projects are rated on the basis of environmental benefit and other criteria for funding assistance pursuant to rules and regulations promulgated by the department as they may be amended from time to time;

“Projected energy efficiency savings” means, at the time a loan agreement is entered into between the agency and a local governmental unit, the savings projected to be derived from the implementation of energy efficient and renewable-energy upgrades to public buildings, as determined in accordance with the rules and regulations promulgated by the Rhode Island infrastructure bank pursuant to this chapter;

“Qualified energy conservation bond” or “QECB” means those bonds designated by 26 U.S.C. § 54D [repealed];

“Revenues,” when used with reference to the agency, means any receipts, fees, payments, moneys, revenues, or other payments received or to be received by the agency in the exercise of its corporate powers under this chapter, including, without limitation: loan repayments, payments on local governmental obligations, non-governmental obligations, grants, aid, appropriations, and other assistance from the state, the United States, or any agency, department, or instrumentality of either or of a political subdivision thereof, bond proceeds, investment earnings, insurance proceeds, amounts in reserves, and other funds and accounts established by or pursuant to this chapter or in connection with the issuance of bonds, including, without limitation, the water pollution control revolving fund, the Rhode Island water pollution control revolving fund, and the local interest subsidy fund, and any other fees, charges or other income received or receivable by the agency;

“Rhode Island water pollution control revolving fund” means the Rhode Island water pollution control revolving fund established pursuant to §

46-12.2-6

;

“Trust agreement” means a trust agreement, loan agreement, security agreement, reimbursement agreement, currency or interest rate exchange agreement, or other security instrument, and a resolution, loan order, or other vote authorizing, securing, or otherwise providing for the issue of bonds, loans, or local governmental obligations or non-governmental obligations;

“Wastewater system revenues” means all rates, rents, fee assessments, charges, and other receipts derived or to be derived by a local governmental unit from wastewater collection and treatment facilities and water pollution abatement projects under its ownership or control, or from the services provided thereby, including, without limitation: proceeds of grants, gifts, appropriations, and loans, including the proceeds of loans or grants awarded by the agency or the department in accordance with this chapter, investment earnings, reserves for capital and current expenses, proceeds of insurance or condemnation, and the sale or other disposition of property; wastewater system revenues may also include rates, rents, fees, charges, and other receipts derived by the local governmental unit from any water supply of distribution facilities or other revenue producing facilities under its ownership or control; wastewater system revenues shall not include any ad valorem taxes levied directly by the local governmental unit on any real and personal property;

“Water pollution abatement project” or “project” means any project eligible pursuant to Title VI of the Clean Water Act including, but not limited to, a wastewater treatment or conveyance project that contributes to removal, curtailment, or mitigation of pollution of the surface water of the state, and conforms with any applicable comprehensive land use plan which has been adopted or any dam safety, removal or maintenance project; it also means a project to enhance the waters of the state, which the agency has been authorized by statute to participate in; it also means any other project to which the agency has been authorized to provide financial assistance;

“Water pollution control revolving fund” means the water pollution control revolving fund contemplated by title VI of the Water Quality Act and established under §

46-12.2-6

;

“Water Quality Act” means the Water Quality Act of 1987, Pub. L. No. 100-4, 101 Stat. 7, 33 U.S.C. § 1251 et seq., as amended from time to time.

History of Section.

P.L. 1989, ch. 303, § 2; P.L. 1993, ch. 259, § 2; P.L. 2001, ch. 112, § 1; P.L. 2001, ch. 135, § 1; P.L. 2001, ch. 144, § 4; P.L. 2001, ch. 163, § 4; P.L. 2009, ch. 5, art. 3, § 1; P.L. 2010, ch. 179, § 1; P.L. 2010, ch. 189, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 219, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 308, § 1; P.L. 2015, ch. 141, art. 14, § 17; P.L. 2017, ch. 480, § 4; P.L. 2019, ch. 216, § 1; P.L. 2019, ch. 257, § 1.

46-12.2-3.
Establishment, composition, appointment of directors of the Rhode Island infrastructure bank.

There is hereby created a body politic and corporate and public instrumentality of the state having distinct legal existence from the state and not constituting a department of the state government, to be known as the Rhode Island clean water finance agency, and, effective September 1, 2015, and thereafter, to be known as the Rhode Island infrastructure bank. Effective September 1, 2015, whenever, in any general law, public law, rule, regulation, bylaw and/or otherwise, any reference is made to the Rhode Island clean water finance agency, by name or otherwise, the reference shall be deemed to refer to and mean the “Rhode Island infrastructure bank.” The agency shall take all necessary actions to effectuate this name change, including, but not limited to, changing the name of the agency on file with any government office. The exercise by the agency of the powers conferred by this chapter shall be deemed to be the performance of an essential public function.

Nothing in this act shall be construed to change or modify the corporate existence of the former Rhode Island clean water finance agency, or to change or modify any contracts or agreements of any kind by, for, or to which the Rhode Island clean water finance agency is a party thereto.

The powers of the agency shall be exercised by or under the supervision of a board of directors consisting of five (5) members, four of whom shall be members of the public appointed by the governor, with the advice and consent of the senate. The governor in making these appointments shall give due consideration to persons skilled and experienced in law, finance, and public administration and give further due consideration to a recommendation by the general treasurer for one of those appointments. All appointments made by the governor shall serve for a term of two (2) years. No one shall be eligible for appointment unless he or she is a resident of this state. The members of the board of directors as of the effective date of this act [July 15, 2005] who were appointed to the board of directors by members of the general assembly shall cease to be members of the board of directors on the effective date of this act. As of the effective date of this act, the general treasurer or his or her designee, who shall be a subordinate within the general treasurer’s department, shall serve on the board of directors as an ex-officio member. Those members of the board of directors as of the effective date of this act who were appointed to the board of directors by the governor shall continue to serve the balance of their current terms.

Each member of the board of directors shall serve until his or her successor is appointed and qualified. The appointed member of the board of directors shall be eligible for reappointment. Any member of the board of directors appointed to fill a vacancy of a public member on the board shall be appointed by the governor, with the advice and consent of the senate, for the unexpired term of the vacant position in the same manner as the member’s predecessor as set forth in subsection (c) of this section. The public members of the board of directors shall be removable by the governor, pursuant to §

36-1-7

and for cause only, and removal solely for partisan or personal reasons unrelated to capacity or fitness for the office shall be unlawful. The governor shall designate one member of the board of directors to be the chairperson of the agency to serve in such capacity during his or her term as a member. The board of directors may elect from among its members such other officers as they deem necessary. Three (3) members of the board of directors shall constitute a quorum. A majority vote of those present shall be required for action. No vacancy in the membership of the board of directors shall impair the right of a quorum to exercise the powers of the board of directors. The members of the board of directors shall serve without compensation, but each member shall be reimbursed for all reasonable expenses incurred in the performance of his or her duties.

Notwithstanding any other provision of general or special law to the contrary, any member of the board of directors, who is also an officer or employee of the state or of a local governmental unit or other public body, shall not thereby be precluded from voting for or acting on behalf of the agency, the state, or local governmental unit or other public body on any matter involving the agency, the state, or that local governmental unit or other public body, and any director, officer, employee, or agent of the agency shall not be precluded from acting for the agency on any particular matter solely because of any interest therein which is shared generally with a substantial segment of the public.

In addition to the board of directors, there is hereby created a green infrastructure strategic advisory council (the “advisory council”). The advisory council shall exist to advise the board of directors on advances related to green infrastructure, energy efficiency, and renewable energy and to make recommendations on potential opportunities for new programs and/or updates to existing programs. The advisory council shall consist of: the executive director of the Rhode Island Infrastructure Bank, or designee, the chairperson of the Rhode Island Infrastructure Bank board of directors, or designee, the secretary of commerce, or designee, the director of the department of environmental management, or designee, the commissioner of the office of energy resources, or designee, the director of the department of health, or designee, the director of the department of transportation, or designee and the executive director of Rhode Island housing, or designee. The chairperson of the Rhode Island Infrastructure Bank, or designee, shall serve as chairperson of the advisory council.

History of Section.

P.L. 1989, ch. 303, § 2; P.L. 2001, ch. 180, § 148; P.L. 2005, ch. 316, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 320, § 1; P.L. 2015, ch. 141, art. 14, § 17.

46-12.2-4.
General powers and duties of agency.

The agency shall have all powers necessary or convenient to carry out and effectuate the purposes and provisions of this chapter, chapter 18 of title 24 and chapter 26.5 of title 39, including without limiting the generality of the foregoing, the powers and duties:

To adopt and amend bylaws, rules, regulations, and procedures for the governance of its affairs, the administration of its financial assistance programs, and the conduct of its business;

To adopt an official seal;

To maintain an office at such place or places as it may determine;

To adopt a fiscal year;

To adopt and enforce procedures and regulations in connection with the performance of its functions and duties;

To sue and be sued;

To employ personnel as provided in §

46-12.2-5

, and to engage accounting, management, legal, financial, consulting and other professional services;

Except as provided in this chapter, to receive and apply its revenues to the purposes of this chapter without appropriation or allotment by the state or any political subdivision thereof;

To borrow money, issue bonds, and apply the proceeds thereof, as provided in this chapter, chapter 19.16 of title 23, chapter 18 of title 24 and chapter 26.5 of title 39, and to pledge or assign or create security interests in revenues, funds, and other property of the agency and otherwise as provided in this, chapter 19.16 of title 23, chapter 18 of title 24 and chapter 26.5 of title 39, to pay or secure the bonds; and to invest any funds held in reserves or in the water pollution control revolving fund, the Rhode Island water pollution control revolving fund, the municipal road and bridge fund established under chapter 18 of title 24, any other funds established in accordance with this chapter, or the local interest subsidy trust fund, or any revenues or funds not required for immediate disbursement, in such investments as may be legal investments for funds of the state;

To obtain insurance and to enter into agreements of indemnification necessary or convenient to the exercise of its powers under this, chapter 19.16 of title 23, chapter 18 of title 24 and chapter 26.5 of title 39;

To apply for, receive, administer, and comply with the conditions and requirements respecting any grant, gift, or appropriation of property, services, or moneys;

To enter into contracts, arrangements, and agreements with other persons, and execute and deliver all instruments necessary or convenient to the exercise of its powers under this, chapter 19.16 of title 23, chapter 18 of title 24 and chapter 26.5 of title 39; such contracts and agreements may include without limitation, loan agreements with a local governmental unit, person or corporation, capitalization grant agreements, intended use plans, operating plans, and other agreements and instruments contemplated by title VI of the Clean Water Act, 33 U.S.C. § 1381 et seq., or this chapter, agreement and instruments contemplated by chapter 18 of title 24, grant agreements, contracts for financial assistance or other forms of assistance from the state or the United States, and trust agreements and other financing agreements and instruments pertaining to bonds;

To authorize a representative to appear on its own behalf before other public bodies, including, without limiting the generality of the foregoing, the congress of the United States, in all matters relating to its powers and purposes;

To provide financial assistance to a local governmental unit, person, or, to a corporation to finance costs of approved projects, and to thereby acquire and hold local governmental obligations and non-governmental obligations at such prices and in such manner as the agency shall deem advisable, and sell local governmental obligations and non-governmental obligations acquired or held by it at prices without relation to cost and in such manner as the agency shall deem advisable, and to secure its own bonds with such obligations all as provided in this chapter, chapter 19.16 of title 23, chapter 18 of title 24 and chapter 26.5 of title 39. Furthermore, in connection with a recommendation by the Rhode Island commerce corporation, this power shall include the power to designate a commercial project as a high priority, and to provide that project with financial assistance as soon as practicable;

To establish and collect such fees and charges as the agency shall determine to be reasonable;

To acquire, own, lease as tenant, or hold real, personal or mixed property or any interest therein for its own use; and to improve, rehabilitate, sell, assign, exchange, lease as landlord, mortgage, or otherwise dispose of or encumber the same;

To do all things necessary, convenient, or desirable for carrying out the purposes of this chapter and chapter 18 of title 24 or the powers expressly granted or necessarily implied by this chapter, chapter 19.16 of title 23, chapter 18 of title 24 and chapter 26.5 of title 39;

To conduct a training course for newly appointed and qualified members and new designees of ex-officio members within six (6) months of their qualification or designation. The course shall be developed by the executive director, approved by the board of directors, and conducted by the executive director. The board of directors may approve the use of any board of directors or staff members or other individuals to assist with training. The training course shall include instruction in the following areas: the provisions of this chapter, chapter 46 of title 42, chapter 14 of title 36, and chapter 2 of title 38; and the agency’s rules and regulations. The director of the department of administration shall, within ninety (90) days of the effective date of this act [July 15, 2005], prepare and disseminate, training materials relating to the provisions of chapter 46 of title 42, chapter 14 of title 36, and chapter 2 of title 38; and

Upon the dissolution of the water resources board (corporate) pursuant to §

46-15.1-22

, to have all the powers and duties previously vested with the water resources board (corporate), as provided pursuant to chapter 15.1 of this title.

To meet at the call of the chair at least eight (8) times per year. All meetings shall be held consistent with chapter 46 of title 42.

To be the sole issuer of QECBs from the state of Rhode Island’s allocation, including any portions of which have been reallocated to the state by local governments, for any project authorized to be financed with the proceeds thereof under the applicable provisions of 26 U.S.C. § 54D [repealed].

Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, the agency shall not be authorized or empowered:

To be or to constitute a bank or trust company within the jurisdiction or under the control of the department of banking and insurance of the state, or the commissioner thereof, the comptroller of the currency of the United States of America, or the Treasury Department thereof; or

To be or constitute a bank, banker or dealer in securities within the meaning of, or subject to the provisions of, any securities, securities exchange, or securities dealers’ law of the United States or the state.

History of Section.

P.L. 1989, ch. 303, § 2; P.L. 2005, ch. 316, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 320, § 1; P.L. 2009, ch. 68, art. 5, § 5; P.L. 2013, ch. 144, art. 20, § 2; P.L. 2015, ch. 141, art. 14, § 17.

46-12.2-4.1.
Power to participate in projects to enhance the waters of the state.

The agency shall have the power to exercise the powers set forth in §

46-12.2-4

to participate in the following projects and classes of projects that enhance the waters of the state: projects for dewatering dredged material, for beneficial use and disposal of dredged material at sites above mean high water and for confined aquatic disposal of dredged materials, provided that the project has been approved by the coastal resources management council and the department as provided for in chapter 6.1 of this title, and further provided that the project is supported either by a fund established for the purposes of supporting such projects or is supported from project revenues. The agency shall cooperate with the coastal resources management council and the department in preparing a proposal for establishing a fund to support projects for dewatering dredged material, for beneficial use and disposal of dredged material at sites above mean high water and for confined aquatic disposal of dredged materials.

History of Section.

P.L. 2001, ch. 144, § 5; P.L. 2001, ch. 163, § 5.

46-12.2-4.2.
Establishment of the efficient buildings fund.

There is hereby authorized and created within the Rhode Island infrastructure bank an efficient buildings fund for the purpose of providing technical, administrative and financial assistance to local governmental units for energy efficient and renewable energy upgrades to public buildings and infrastructure, including, but not limited to, streetlights. The Rhode Island infrastructure bank shall review and approve all applications for projects to be financed through the efficient buildings fund.

The office of energy resources shall promulgate rules and regulations establishing a project priority list for efficient buildings fund and the process through which a local governmental unit may submit an application for inclusion of a project on the project priority list. Upon issuance of the project priority list by the office of energy resources, the project priority list shall be used by the Rhode Island infrastructure bank to determine the order in which financial assistance shall be awarded. The Rhode Island infrastructure bank shall promulgate rules and regulations to effectuate the provisions of this section which may include, without limitation, forms for financial assistance applications, loan agreements, and other instruments. All rules and regulations promulgated pursuant to this chapter shall be promulgated in accordance with the provisions of chapter 35 of title 42. Eligibility for receipt of this financial assistance by a local governmental unit shall be conditioned upon that local governmental unit reallocating their remaining proportional QECB allocation to the state of Rhode Island.

The Rhode Island infrastructure bank shall have all the powers necessary and convenient to carry out and effectuate the purposes and provisions of this section including, without limiting the generality of the preceding statement, the authority:

To receive and disburse such funds from the state and federal government as may be available for the purpose of the fund subject to the provisions of this section;

To make and enter into binding commitments to provide financial assistance to eligible borrowers from amounts on deposit in the fund;

To levy administrative fees on eligible borrowers as necessary to effectuate the provisions of this section, provided the fees have been previously authorized by an agreement between the Rhode Island infrastructure bank and the eligible borrower;

To engage the services of third-party vendors to provide professional services;

To establish one or more accounts within the fund; and

Such other authority as granted to the Rhode Island infrastructure bank under this chapter.

Subject to the provisions of this section and to any agreements with the holders of any bonds of the Rhode Island infrastructure bank or any trustee therefor, amounts held by the Rhode Island infrastructure bank for the account of the fund shall be applied by the Rhode Island infrastructure bank, either by direct expenditure, disbursement, or transfer to one or more other funds and accounts held by the Rhode Island infrastructure bank or maintained under any trust agreement pertaining to bonds, either alone or with other funds of the Rhode Island infrastructure bank, to the following purposes:

To provide financial assistance to local governmental units to finance costs of approved projects, as set forth in subsection (a), and to refinance the costs of the projects, subject to such terms and conditions, if any, as are determined by the Rhode Island infrastructure bank;

To fund reserves for bonds of the Rhode Island infrastructure bank and to purchase insurance and pay the premiums therefor, and pay fees and expenses of letters or lines of credit and costs of reimbursement to the issuers thereof for any payments made thereon or on any insurance, and to otherwise provide security for, and a source of payment for obligations of the Rhode Island infrastructure bank, by pledge, lien, assignment, or otherwise as provided in this chapter;

To pay expenses of the Rhode Island infrastructure bank in administering the fund;

To provide a reserve for, or to otherwise secure, amounts payable by borrowers on loans and obligations outstanding in the event of default thereof; amounts in any account in the fund may be applied to defaults on loans outstanding to the borrower for which the account was established and, on a parity basis with all other accounts, to defaults on any loans or obligations outstanding; and

To provide a reserve for, or to otherwise secure, by pledge, lien, assignment, or otherwise as provided in this chapter, any bonds of the Rhode Island infrastructure bank.

In addition to other remedies of the Rhode Island infrastructure bank under any loan agreement or otherwise provided by law, the Rhode Island infrastructure bank may also recover from a borrower, in an action in superior court, any amount due the Rhode Island infrastructure bank together with any other actual damages the Rhode Island infrastructure bank shall have sustained from the failure or refusal of the borrower to make the payments or abide by the terms of the loan agreement.

The Rhode Island infrastructure bank may create one or more loan loss reserve funds to serve as further security for any loans made by the Rhode Island infrastructure bank or any bonds of the Rhode Island infrastructure bank issued to fund energy efficiency improvements in public buildings in accordance with this section.

To the extent possible, and in accordance with law, the infrastructure bank shall encourage the use of project labor agreements for projects over ten million dollars ($10,000,000) and local hiring on projects funded under this section.

Any financial assistance provided by the Rhode Island infrastructure bank to a public entity for the purpose of retrofitting a school building shall not be subject to the match established by Rhode Island general laws §§

16-7-35

to

16-7-47

, and shall be made subject to coordination with the Rhode Island department of education.

History of Section.

P.L. 2015, ch. 141, art. 14, § 18.